Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB755.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 336 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A labor organization certified or recognized as the recognized bargaining
representative of a bargaining unit of public employees under this chapter shall
represent all employees in the bargaining unit in collective bargaining
negotiations and in the administration and enforcement of a collective
bargaining agreement without discrimination.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a labor organization shall not be
required to provide individualized grievance representation, disciplinary
representation, investigatory representation, arbitration advocacy, or related
individualized advocacy services to an employee who is not a dues-paying
member of the labor organization at the time the services are requested.
(3) In any proceeding that does not involve the interpretation or enforcement of a
collective bargaining agreement, a nonmember employee may represent himself
or herself or be represented by counsel or a representative of the employee's
choosing, subject to reasonable employer procedures.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2271
(4) (a) In any proceeding involving the interpretation or enforcement of a
collective bargaining agreement, the labor organization shall have the right
to determine whether to represent a nonmember employee.
(b) If the labor organization elects to provide such representation, it may
charge the nonmember employee a reasonable fee not to exceed the actual
cost of the services provided.
(c) If the labor organization elects not to provide representation, the
nonmember employee may represent himself or herself or be represented by
counsel or a representative of the employee's choosing, subject to
reasonable employer procedures.
(5) A labor organization and a nonmember employee may enter into a written
agreement for the provision of individualized representation services in any
proceeding, consistent with the terms of this section.
Section 2. This Act applies to collective bargaining agreements entered into or
renewed on or after the effective date of this Act.
Section 3. If any provision of this Act or its application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect the other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:35 PM Jacketed